Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5729
Refunds; interest not allowable.

Interest shall not be allowable on any refunds paid because of benefits earned under the Nebraska Advantage Act.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 51.